src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/N-swbraa_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - sõbrā: # Noun 40 'eng /est sõber/fin' - full paradigm
     sõbrā+N+Sg+Nom: sõbrā
     sõbrā+N+Sg+Gen: sõbrā
     sõbrā+N+Sg+Par: [sõʼbrõ, sõbrõ]
     sõbrā+N+Sg+Dat: sõbrān
     sõbrā+N+Sg+Ins: sõbrāks
     sõbrā+N+Sg+Ill: [sõʼbrõ, sõbrõ]
     sõbrā+N+Sg+Ela: sõbrāst
     sõbrā+N+Pl+Nom: sõbrād
     sõbrā+N+Pl+Gen: sõbrād
     sõbrā+N+Pl+Par: sõbrīdi
     sõbrā+N+Pl+Dat: sõbrādõn
     sõbrā+N+Pl+Ins: sõbrādõks
     sõbrā+N+Pl+Ill: sõbrīž
     sõbrā+N+Pl+Ela: sõbrīst
